Utah statutes.
61-2-202.   Powers and duties of the director or division.
(1)  On or before October 1 of each year, in conjunction with the department,
the director shall report to the governor and the Legislature concerning the
division's work for the fiscal year immediately preceding the report.
(2)  In conjunction with the executive director, the director shall prepare
and submit to the governor and the Legislature a budget for the fiscal year
that follows the convening of the Legislature.
